Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-403 Disposal of ineligible property
and securities. (a) Any personal property or securities lawfully acquired
by an insurer, which it could not otherwise have invested in or loaned its
funds upon at the time of the acquisition, shall be disposed of by the insurer
within three years from date of acquisition, unless within such period the
security has attained the standard for eligibility. The commissioner, upon
application and reasonable showing that forced sale of any such property or
security would be against the best interests of the insurer, may extend the
disposal period for an additional reasonable time.

(b) While any such property or security
remains so ineligible, it shall not be allowed as an asset of the insurer.

(c) Any ineligible property or security
acquired contrary to this article by an insurer shall be disposed of forthwith;
for failure so to do within sixty days after order of the commissioner
requiring such disposal, the commissioner may revoke or suspend the insurer's
certificate of authority.

(d) For the purposes of subsection (c), an
investment otherwise eligible shall not be deemed ineligible for the reason
that it is in excess of the amount permitted under this article to be invested
in the category of investments to which it belongs; any such excess investment
shall be disposed of within the time prescribed in subsection (a). [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next